bg_CS.dic
ꙗди/KKVG	po:verbimp
ꙗдѣти/V6	po:verb
ꙗдѫ/KKVC	po:adv
ꙗстъ/V5A1	po:verb
бꙑти/V6	po:verbinf
бꙑхъ/V9	po:verbaor
баловати/V6	po:verbinf
басъ/VA	po:verb
бимь/V9	po:verbaor
бити/V6	po:verb
бихъ/SRV9	po:verbaor
блюсти/V6	po:verbinf
блюсъ/VA	po:verb
блѣд/KKW3	po:stem
богат/KKW3	po:stem
боденъ/VB	po:passive
брати/V6	po:verb
бу/KKW3	po:stem
будити/V6	po:verbinf
бьрати/V6	po:verbinf
бьрахъ/V9	po:verbaor
бѣахъ/V9	po:verbaor
бѣсн/KKW5	po:stem
бѣстъ/V5A1	po:verb
бѣхъ/V9	po:verbaor
бѫди/VF	po:verbimp
величити/V6	po:verbinf
вельрѣчевати/V6	po:verbinf
велѣти/V6	po:verbinf
ветъш/KKW3	po:stem
виденъ/VB	po:adj
видимъ/VB	po:passive
видѣти/V6	po:verbinf
вити/V6	po:verb
влачити/V6	po:verbinf
влещи/V6	po:verbinf
влѣхъ/V9	po:verbaor
влѧсти/V6	po:verbinf
вражьдовати/V6	po:verbinf
врати/V6	po:verbinf
врахъ/V9	po:verb
вращати/V6	po:verbinf
врѣдити/V6	po:verbinf
врѣщи/VHV6SQ	po:verbinf
врѣщти/SRV6	po:verbinf
въврьгъ/V8	po:verb
въжахъ/V9	po:verb
възлѧгъ/V8	po:verb
вълив/KKW4	po:stem
вълѣзъ/V8	po:verb
въпрашати/V6	po:verbinf
въскрьснѫти/V6	po:verbinf
въспѣв/KKW4	po:stem
вьрати/V6	po:verbinf
вьрѣти/V6SQ	po:verbinf
вѣдъ/V8SR	po:verb
вѣдѣхъ/V9SR	po:verbaor
вѣр/KKW5	po:stem
вѣстъ/V5A1	po:verb
вѣсъ/VA	po:verb
вѧзати/V6SQSR	po:verbinf
глаголати/VHV6SQ	po:verbinf
глаголѥмъ/VB	po:adv
глашати/V6SQ	po:verbinf
гнити/V6	po:verbinf
грети/V6SQ	po:verbinf
грѣсъ/VA	po:verb
грѧсти/VHV6	po:verbinf
дади/KKVG	po:verbimp
дадѫ/KKVC	po:adverb
дар/KKW5	po:stem
двигни/VF	po:verbimp
двигномъ/VB	po:passive
двигнѫти/VHV6	po:verbinf
двигнѫхъ/V9	po:verb
двигъ/V8	po:verb
двнгномъ/VB	po:adv
дѣл/KKW4	po:stem
дѣланъ/VB	po:adj
дѣлахъ/V9	po:verb
дѫти/V6	po:verbinf
женити/V6	po:verbinf
жещи/VHV6	po:verbinf
жрѣти/V6	po:verbinf
жѧти/V6	po:verb
зажещи/V6	po:verb
зинѫти/V6	po:verbinf
знавъ/VE	po:adv
знаи/VG	po:verbimp
знамен/W4KKW5	po:stem
знаѧ/KKVC	po:adv
зъвати/SQVHV6	po:verbinf
зьрѣти/V6SQ	po:verbinf
игр/KKW4	po:stem
идъ/V8SR	po:verb
имаи/VG	po:verbimp
иматъ/V5A1	po:verb
имен/KKW5	po:stem
имѣти/V6	po:verbinf
имѫ/KKVC	po:adv
ити/VHV6SR	po:verbinf
ищи/VG	po:verbimp
кꙑпѣти/V6	po:verbinf
капати/V6	po:verbinf
класти/V6	po:verbinf
клевет/KKW3	po:stem
клѧти/V6	po:verbinf
клѧхъ/V9	po:verb
коснѫти/V6	po:verbinf
коснѫхъ/V9	po:verb
крꙑти/V6	po:verb
кѧзати/V6	po:verb
лагахъ/V9SRSQ	po:verbaor
лешти/V6	po:verbinf
лѣти/VHV6SQSR	po:verbinf
маꙗти/V6	po:verb
манѫти/SRV6	po:verbinf
метати/V6	po:verbinf
мил/KKW5	po:stem
милосрьд/KKW5	po:stem
млъкнѫти/V6	po:verbinf
могъ/V8SQ	po:verb
мози/VFSQ	po:verbimp
молитв/KKW5	po:stem
молѧ/VC	po:adv
мощи/V6SQ	po:verbinf
мѣнѫти/SRV6	po:verbinf
мѧсти/V6SQ	po:verbinf
напоихъ/V9	po:verbaor
нариц/KKW4	po:stem
наслѣд/KKW5	po:stem
неси/VF	po:verbimp
нести/V6SQ	po:verbinf
несъ/VE	po:adv
несѫ/KKVC	po:adv
носити/V6	po:verbinf
нѣмъ/VB	po:adv
нѣстъ/V5	po:verb
обращи/VF	po:verbimp
обѣд/KKW5	po:stem
обѣсити/V6	po:verbinf
оврѧщъ/V8	po:verb
оставл/KKW3	po:stem
отъвѣщ/KKW4	po:stem
падъ/V8	po:verb
пасти/V6	po:verbinf
пещи/VHV6	po:verbinf
писати/V6	po:verbinf
плакати/V6	po:verbinf
плелъ/VB	po:adj
плетомъ/VB	po:passive
плъзнѫти/V6	po:verbinf
плѣсъ/VA	po:verb
побѣжденъ/VB	po:passive
погибнѫти/V6	po:verbinf
подав/KKW4	po:stem
поклонити/V6	po:verbinf
почити/V6	po:verb
поѩхъ/V9	po:verb
проклѧтъ/VB	po:passive
пророчьств/KKW5	po:stem
прострѣти/V6	po:verbinf
прошенъ/VB	po:adj
пьрати/V6	po:verbinf
пѧсъ/VA	po:verbaor
пѧти/VHV6	po:verbinf
работ/KKW4	po:stem
разум/KKW3	po:stem
расти/V6SQ	po:verbinf
реченъ/VB	po:passive
ринѫти/V6	po:verbinf
рѣꙗти/V6	po:verb
рѣхъ/V9	po:verb
рѣченъ/VB	po:adj
слꙑшати/V6	po:verb
слаб/KKW3	po:stem
срамити/V6SQ	po:verbinf
стар/KKW3	po:stem
стати/VHV6SQ	po:verbinf
стрѣщи/V6	po:verbinf
стѫпити/VHV6SR	po:verbinf
събир/KKW4	po:stem
събьрати/V6	po:nouninf
събьрахъ/V9	po:verbaor
съгрѣв/KKW4	po:stem
сълати/VHV6SR	po:verbinf
съмотрити/V6	po:verbinf
сѣи/VG	po:verbimp
сѣсти/V6	po:verb
сѣѥмъ/VB	po:passive
сѣѧ/VD	po:adv
сѧадъ/V8	po:verb
таити/V6	po:verbinf
тлѣщи/V6	po:verbinf
трути/V6	po:verbinf
трѣти/V6	po:verbinf
трѧсъ/VASR	po:verb
тѣхъ/V9	po:verb
тѧгнѫти/SRV6	po:verbinf
убив/KKW4	po:stem
украдъ/V8	po:verb
умѣхъ/V9	po:verb
хвалити/V6	po:verbinf
хвалнмъ/VB	po:adv
хваль/VE	po:adv
хвалѧ/VC	po:adv
хотѣхъ/V9	po:verbaor
хощети/V6	po:verb
цъвтѣти/V6	po:verbinf
цѣлити/V6	po:verbinf
цѣлѣти/V6SQ	po:verbinf
чезнѫти/V6	po:verbinf
чисъ/VA	po:verb
чрѣсти/V6	po:verbinf
чѧхъ/V9SQ	po:verb
ѩти/V6	po:verbinf
ѩхъ/V9	po:verb
вѣдѫ/KKVC	po:adv
сѫ/KKVC	po:adv
ꙗдѫ/KKVC	po:adv
дадѫ/KKVC	po:adv
двигнѫ/VC	po:adv
съланъ/VBSR
